lexicon/transformations/transducers/nahuat/lexc/variant.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>

LEXICON Root
Cns ;
Vow ;


LEXICON Loop
Cns ;
Vow ;
 #  ;


LEXICON Vow
FrontVow ;
LowBackVow ;
HighBackVow ;


LEXICON FrontVow
i:i Loop ;
e:e Loop ;
é:é Loop ;
í:í Loop ;

e%::ē Loop;
i%::ī Loop;
ee:ē Loop;
ii:ī Loop;

LEXICON HighBackVow
u:u Cns ;
uh:w Cns ;
uh:w # ;
u:w Vow ;


LEXICON LowBackVow
a:a Loop ;
o:o Loop ;
a%::ā Loop;
o%::ō Loop ;
aa:ā Loop;
oo:ō Loop ;

LEXICON Lateral
l:l Loop ;

LEXICON CnsNonLateral

h:ʔ Cns ;
h:ʔ # ;
h:ʔ Vow ;
j:ʔ Cns ;
j:ʔ # ;
j:ʔ Vow ;

b:b Loop ;
c:s FrontVow ;
c:k LowBackVow ;
cu:kʷ Vow ;
c:k CnsNonGlottal ;
c:k # ;
ç:s Vow ;
ch:t͡ʃ Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
hu:w Vow ;
k:k Loop ;
kw:kʷ Vow ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
p:p Loop ;
qu:kʷ LowBackVow ;
qu:k FrontVow ;
r:r Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
t:t CnsNonLateral ;
t:t Vow ;
t:t # ;
tl:ɬ Vow ;
tl:ɬ # ;
w:w Loop ;
x:ʃ Loop ;
z:s Loop ;
y:y Loop ;


LEXICON CnsNonGlottal
b:b Loop ;
c:s FrontVow ;
c:k LowBackVow ;
cu:kʷ Vow ;
c:k CnsNonGlottal ;
c:k # ;
ç:s Vow ;
ch:t͡ʃ Loop "weight: 2.0";
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
k:k Loop ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
p:p Loop ;
qu:kʷ LowBackVow ;
qu:k FrontVow ;
r:r Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
t:t CnsNonLateral ;
t:t Vow ;
t:t # ;
tl:ɬ Vow ;
tl:ɬ # ;
w:w Loop ;
x:ʃ Loop ;
z:s Loop ;
l:l Loop ;



LEXICON Cns
Lateral ;
CnsNonLateral ;
